Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1127
Court-ordered custody and treatment; annual review hearings; procedure.

The court shall hold annual review hearings of each order of disposition issued under section 71-1126 prior to the expiration date of such order. Prior to the annual review hearing, the department shall submit an updated plan for custody and treatment of the subject. It shall be the burden of the state to show by clear and convincing evidence that court-ordered custody and treatment continues to be necessary. The court shall determine whether the evidence supports continuing the court-ordered custody and treatment of the subject. At the review hearing, the court shall consider the evidence received at the original and any subsequent hearings, the plan and updates submitted by the department, progress reports and recommendations from the treatment program, and any other relevant evidence. Following the review hearing, the court may continue or modify the court-ordered custody and treatment or may vacate such custody and treatment and dismiss the matter.

Laws 2005, LB 206, § 27.